New York, session 2025-2026, S9137.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 179 of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 21 to read as follows: 3 21. Inspect and test, either personally or through authorized agents, 4 as often as the commissioner deems necessary, but no less than annually, 5 meters and other apparatus used for regulating, supplying and/or ascer- 6 taining the quantity of gas or electricity supplied to residential and 7 commercial utility customers to verify that such apparatus are properly 8 maintained and calibrated, and to keep a record of the same. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14741-01-6